Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 32 COLORADO MINED LAND RECLAMATION ACT
34-32-110. Limited impact operations - expedited process.

Any person desiring to conduct mining operations pursuant to an application submitted prior to July 1, 1993, on less than two acres that will result in the extraction of less than seventy thousand tons per year of mineral or overburden may apply for the expedited processing of the person's permit. By July 1, 2015, a person with a permit issued pursuant to this subparagraph (I) shall file with the office:
(1) (a) (I) Any person desiring to conduct mining operations pursuant to an application submitted prior to July 1, 1993, on less than two acres that will result in the extraction of less than seventy thousand tons per year of mineral or overburden may apply for the expedited processing of the person's permit. By July 1, 2015, a person with a permit issued pursuant to this subparagraph (I) shall file with the office:

Evidence of the source of the person's legal right to enter and initiate a mining operation on the affected land; and

A financial warranty that complies with subsection (3) of this section.

Repealed.

Effective July 1, 2014, a person desiring to conduct mining operations on five acres or less may file with the office an application for a permit to conduct limited-impact mining operations; except that a person desiring to conduct in situ leach mining or a designated mining operation must file an application pursuant to section

34-32-112.5

. A person shall not commence mining operations subject to this subparagraph (III) unless the person has filed an application pursuant to this section. The application for a permit must be on a form approved by the board and must contain the following:

The address and telephone number of the operator's general office and the operator's local address or addresses and telephone number;

The name, address, and telephone number of the owner of the surface of the affected land and the source of the applicant's legal right to enter and initiate a mining operation on the affected land;

The name of the owner of the subsurface rights of the affected land;

A statement that the operations will be conducted pursuant to the terms and conditions listed on the application and in accordance with this article and the rules promulgated pursuant to this article at the time the permit was approved or amended;

A map showing information sufficient to determine the location of the affected land and existing and proposed roads or access routes to be used in connection with the mining operation;

The approximate size of the affected land;

Information sufficient to describe or identify the type of mining operation proposed and how the operator intends to conduct it;

A statement that the operator has applied for necessary local government approvals; and

Measures to be taken to reclaim any affected land consistent with the requirements of section

34-32-116

.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 1178, § 4, effective July 1, 1993.)

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 1178, § 4, effective July 1, 1993.)

Fees and financial warranties for permit applications submitted pursuant to this subsection (1) are governed by subsection (3) of this section.

A person desiring to conduct mining operations not covered by subsection (1) of this section on less than ten acres, which will result in the extraction of less than seventy thousand tons of mineral or overburden per calendar year, prior to commencement of mining, may file with the office, on a form approved by the board, an application for a permit to conduct mining operations; except that applications for in situ leach mining or a designated mining operation must be filed pursuant to section 34-32-112.5. This application must contain the following:

The address and telephone number of the general office and the local address or addresses and telephone number of the operator;

The name, address, and telephone number of the owner of the surface of the affected land and the source of the applicant's legal right to enter and initiate a mining operation on the affected land;

The name of the owner of the subsurface rights of the affected land;

A statement that the operations will be conducted pursuant to the terms and conditions listed on the application and in accordance with the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article at the time the permit was approved or amended;

A map showing information sufficient to determine the location of the affected land and existing and proposed roads or access routes to be used in connection with the mining operation;

The approximate size of the affected land;

Information sufficient to describe or identify the type of mining operation proposed and how the operator intends to conduct it;

A statement that the operator has applied for necessary local government approval;

Measures to be taken to reclaim any affected land consistent with the requirements of section 34-32-116.

The application required by this subsection (2) shall be sent to the office. If the office denies the application, the applicant may appeal to the board for final determination.

A fee as specified in section 34-32-127 (2), and a financial warranty in an amount the board shall determine pursuant to section 34-32-117 (4), shall accompany the application and shall be paid by the applicant.

The operator, at any time after the completion of reclamation, may notify the board that the land has been reclaimed. Upon receipt of the notice that the affected land or a portion of it has been reclaimed, the board shall cause the land to be inspected and shall release the performance and financial warranties or appropriate portions thereof within thirty days after the board finds the reclamation to be satisfactory and in accordance with a plan agreed upon by the board and the operator.

After July 1, 1988, any operator proposing to engage in a mining operation as provided in this section shall file a permit application to engage in mining prior to the start of the mining operation.

The office shall process and take final action on applications for permits made pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section within thirty days after the filing of the application. If action upon the application is not completed within thirty days, the permit is deemed approved and shall be promptly issued upon presentation by the applicant of a financial warranty in the amount provided in subsection (3) of this section. Sections 34-32-112, 34-32-114, and 34-32-115 concerning publication, notice, written objections, petitions, and supporting documents shall, so far as practicable, apply to this section, but the board shall, by rule, provide simplified and reduced procedures and requirements that are applicable to the thirty-day period. Within the thirty-day period, the board may make a determination on an application as provided in sections 34-32-114 and 34-32-115.

Any operator conducting an operation under a permit issued under this section who has held the permit for two consecutive years or more and who subsequently desires to expand it to a size in excess of the limitation set forth in subsection (1) or (2) of this section may request the conversion of his permit by filing an application for a permit pursuant to subsection (2) of this section or section 34-32-112; except that the applicant need not supply information, materials, and other data and undertakings previously supplied, including any additional materials provided to the board during the course of his current operation, or resulting from the board's inspections thereof.

The office shall process and take final action on applications for conversion of a permit under this subsection (7) in accordance with subsection (2) of this section or section 34-32-115, as appropriate. If the office does not take action upon the conversion of the permit in accordance with the time limits of this subsection (7) or section 34-32-115, the conversion is deemed approved, and a permit for the life of the mine shall be promptly issued upon presentation by the applicant of a financial warranty subject to the limitations provided in subsection (3) of this section or section 34-32-115 (3) or 34-32-117 (4).

The provisions of sections 34-32-112, 34-32-114, and 34-32-115 concerning publication, notice, written objections, petitions, and supporting documents shall so far as practicable apply to this section.

The board or office shall not deny the conversion of a permit for any reason other than those set forth in section 34-32-115 (4).

Repealed.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 730, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(9) added, p. 1251, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 81:

(9) amended, p. 1677, § 1, effective April 30; (3), (5), (7), and (8)(b) amended, p. 1668, § 4, effective June 19.

L. 82:

(9) amended, p. 628, § 38, effective April 2.

L. 85:

(3) amended, p. 1127, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 88:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1204, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(8) amended, p. 756, § 31, effective April 4; (3) amended, p. 1419, § 2, effective May 6; (3) and (8) amended, p. 1433, § 5, effective July 1; (8) amended, p. 1072, § 51, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(8) amended, p. 2181, § 49, effective June 2; IP(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(e), IP(2)(a), (2)(b), and (7)(d) amended, p. 1939, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) and IP(2)(a) amended, p. 1178, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(8) repealed, p. 179, § 3, effective April 18.

L. 2008:

IP(2)(a) amended, p. 936, § 2, effective May 20.

L. 2014:

(1)(a), (1)(d), IP(2)(a), (2)(a)(II), (6), and (7)(b) amended and (1)(f) added, (SB14-076), ch. 42, p. 210, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2022:

(1)(f) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2983, § 76, effective August 10.

34-32-111. Special permits - ten-day processing. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 732, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(2)(d), (3)(h), (5), and (6) amended, p. 1669, § 5, effective June 19.

L. 84:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1122, § 31, effective June 7.

L. 88:

(3)(f) and (3)(i) amended, p. 1208, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2)(c) amended, p. 1433, § 6, effective July 1; (7) amended, p. 1072, § 52, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1752, § 1, effective June 6; (2)(d) and (6) amended, p. 1179, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 180, § 9, effective April 18.

34-32-112. Application for reclamation permit - changes in permits - fees - notice.

Any operator desiring to obtain a reclamation permit shall make written application to the board or to the office for a permit on forms provided by the board. The reclamation permit or the renewal of an existing permit, if approved, shall authorize the operator to engage in such mining operation upon the affected land described in such application for the life of the mine. Such application shall consist of the following:

Five copies of the application;

A reclamation plan submitted with each of the applications;

An accurate map of the affected land submitted with each of the applications;

The application fee as specified in section 34-32-127 (2).

The application forms shall state:

The legal description and area of affected land;

The owner of the surface of the area of affected land;

The owner of the substance to be mined;

The source of the applicant's legal right to enter and initiate a mining operation on the affected land;

The address and telephone number of the general office and the local address and telephone number of the applicant;

Information sufficient to describe or identify the type of mining operation proposed and how the operator, in his sole discretion, intends to conduct it;

The size of the area to be worked at any one time;

The timetable estimating the periods of time which will be required for the various stages of the mining operation. The operator shall not be required to meet the timetable, nor shall the timetable be subject to independent review by the board or the office.

For in situ leach mining operations, a certification by the applicant that no violations exist as described in section 34-32-115 (5)(d). If the applicant is not able to so certify, the applicant shall describe the circumstances as may be relevant to section 34-32-115 (5)(d) and provide the board or office any additional information reasonably requested regarding any such circumstances.

For in situ leach mining operations, a description of at least five in situ leach mining operations that demonstrates the ability of the applicant to conduct the proposed mining operation without any leakage, vertical or lateral migration, or excursion of any leaching solutions or groundwater-containing minerals, radionuclides, or other constituents mobilized, liberated, or introduced by the in situ leach mining process into any groundwater outside of the permitted in situ leach mining area. The fact that the applicant was not involved in any of the five operations shall not preclude the applicant from making the demonstration required by this paragraph (j).

The reclamation plan shall include provisions for, or satisfactory explanation of, all general requirements for the type of reclamation proposed to be implemented by the operator. Reclamation shall be required on all the affected land. The reclamation plan shall include:

A description of the types of reclamation the operator proposes to achieve in the reclamation of the affected land, why each was chosen, and the amount of acreage accorded to each;

A description of how the reclamation plan will be implemented to meet the requirements of section 34-32-116;

A proposed plan or schedule indicating when and how reclamation will be implemented. Such plan or schedule shall not be tied to any date specific, but shall be tied to the implementation or completion of different stages of the mining operation.

Repealed.

A map of all of the proposed affected land by all phases of the total scope of the mining operation. It shall indicate the following:

The expected physical appearance of the area of the affected land, correlated to the proposed timetables required by paragraph (h) of subsection (2) of this section and the plan or schedule required by paragraph (c) of this subsection (3); and

Portrayal of the proposed final land use for each portion of the affected lands.

The accurate map of the affected lands shall:

Be made by a professional land surveyor, professional engineer, or other qualified person;

Identify the area which corresponds with the application;

Show adjoining surface owners of record;

Be made to a scale of not less than one hundred feet to the inch and not more than six hundred sixty feet to the inch;

Show the name and location of all creeks, roads, buildings, oil and gas wells and lines, and power and communication lines on the area of affected land and within two hundred feet of all boundaries of such area;

Show the total area to be involved in the operation, including the area to be mined and the area of affected land;

Show the topography of the area with contour lines of sufficient detail to portray the direction and rate of slope of the affected land in question;

Indicate on a map or by a statement the general type, thickness, and distribution of soil over the area in question, including the affected land;

Show the type of present vegetation covering the affected land.

The reclamation plan shall also show by statement or map the depth and thickness of the ore body or deposit to be mined and the thickness and type of the overburden to be removed.

An application fee as specified in section 34-32-127 (2) shall be paid.

Each phase of reclamation is to be completed within five years after the date the operator advises the board that such phase has commenced, as provided in the introductory portion of section 34-32-116 (7)(q); except that such period may be extended by the board upon a finding that additional time is necessary for the completion of the terms of the reclamation plan.

An operator may, within the term of a reclamation permit, apply to the board or to the office for a reclamation permit amendment increasing the acreage to be affected or otherwise revising the reclamation plan. Where applicable, there shall be filed with any application for amendment a map and an application with the same content as required for an original application. The amended application shall be accompanied by a fee as specified in section 34-32-127 (2). Where an operator files a notice of temporary cessation pursuant to section 34-32-103 (6)(a)(II), such notice shall be accompanied by a fee as specified in section 34-32-127 (2). In addition, supplemental performance and financial warranties, as determined by the board or office, for any additional acreage shall be submitted. If the area of the original application is reduced, the amount of the financial warranty, as determined by the board or office, shall proportionately be reduced. Renewal applications shall contain the information required in the original application if different from that in the original application or renewal. The renewal reclamation permit shall show the area mined or disturbed and the area reclaimed since the original permit or the last renewal. Applications for renewal or amendment of a reclamation permit shall be reviewed by the board or the office in the same manner as applications for new reclamation permits.

Information provided the board or the office in an application for a reclamation permit relating to the location, size, or nature of the deposit or information required by subsection (5) of this section and marked confidential by the operator shall be protected as confidential information by the board and the office and not be a matter of public record in the absence of a written release from the operator or until such mining operation has been terminated. A person who willfully and knowingly violates the provisions of this subsection (9) or section 34-32-113 (3) commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Upon the filing of an application for a reclamation permit with the board or the office, the applicant shall place a copy of such application for public inspection at the office of the board and at the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the affected land is located. The copy of the application placed at the office of the county clerk and recorder shall not be recorded but shall be retained there until said application has been heard by the board or the office and be available for inspection during such period, and, at the end of such period, such copy may be reclaimed or destroyed by the applicant. The information exempted by subsection (9) of this section shall be deleted from such file copies.

The applicant shall cause notice of the filing of such applicant's application to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the proposed mining operation once a week for four consecutive weeks, commencing not more than ten days after the filing of said application with the board or the office. Such notice shall contain information regarding the identity of the applicant, the location of the proposed mining operation if such information does not violate the provisions of subsection (9) of this section, the proposed dates of commencement and completion of the operation, the proposed future use of the affected land, the location where additional information about the operation may be obtained, and the location and final date for filing objections with the board or the office.

In addition, the applicant shall mail a copy of such notice immediately after first publication to all owners of record of the surface rights of the affected land, to the owners of record of immediately adjacent lands, to the owners of record of lands within three miles of affected land for in situ leach mining operations, and to any other persons who are owners of record that may be designated by the board that might be affected by the proposed mining operation. Proof of such notice and mailing, such as certified mail with return receipt requested where possible, shall be provided to the board or the office and become part of the application.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 733, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(6) amended, p. 1251, § 2, effective May 25; (10)(a) amended, p. 1253, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(6) amended, p. 1677, § 2, effective April 30; (8) amended, p. 1679, § 1, effective May 21; (8) amended, p. 1669, § 6, effective June 19.

L. 83:

(9) amended, p. 2051, § 22, effective October 14.

L. 84:

(4)(a) amended, p. 1122, § 32, effective June 7.

L. 88:

IP(1), (2)(f), (2)(h), IP(3), (3)(c), (3)(e)(I), (6) to (9), and (10)(a) amended and (3)(d) repealed, pp. 1208, 1215, §§ 9, 16, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(6) amended, p. 757, § 32, effective April 4; IP(1), (2)(h), (8), (9), and (10) amended, p. 1420, § 3, effective May 6; (1)(d), (6), and (8) amended, p. 1434, § 7, effective July 1; (6) amended, p. 1072, § 53, effective July 1.

L. 92:

IP(1), (2)(h), (8), (9), and (10) amended, p. 1940, § 38, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(9) amended, p. 1546, § 300, effective October 1.

L. 2004:

(10)(c) amended, p. 1784, § 1, effective June 4.

L. 2008:

(2)(i) and (2)(j) added and (10)(c) amended, pp. 936, 937, §§ 3, 4, effective May 20.

34-32-112.5. Designated mining operation - rules.

This section shall apply only to designated mining operations as defined in section 34-32-103 (3.5). All nondesignated mining operations are exempt from this section. The board may propose that the general assembly enact specific requirements for exempted operations as set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

If an operator demonstrates to the board at the time of applying for a permit or at a subsequent hearing that toxic or acidic chemicals are not stored or used on-site and that acid- or toxic-producing materials will not be used, stored, or disturbed in quantities sufficient to adversely affect any person, any property, or the environment, the board shall exempt such operations whether conducted pursuant to section 34-32-110 or otherwise. The board may promulgate rules governing the conduct of mining operations which are exempted pursuant to this subsection (2).

When promulgating rules governing designated mining operations, the board shall consider the economic reasonableness, the technical feasibility, and the level or degree of any environmental concerns which may result from:

Designated mining operations which qualify for permits under section 34-32-110 which shall be referred to as "110d" permits;

Designated mining operations which qualify for permits under section 34-32-112, but which affect less than fifty acres and extract less than one million tons per year which shall be referred to as "112d-1" permits;

Designated mining operations which qualify for permits under section 34-32-112 which do not qualify as 112d-1 permits but which affect less than one hundred acres and which extract less than five million tons per year which shall be referred to as "112d-2" permits; or

Any other designated mining operation which shall be referred to as "112d-3" permits.

By rule or as a condition of issuing a permit, the board or office may require an operator to have an inspection and certification of any new environmental protection facility during its construction at a designated mining operation. Any such rule or condition may include a prohibition on subsequent phases of construction or operation until any required inspections have been performed and the requisite certification has been obtained.

An inspection and certification shall be conducted by a properly qualified professional.

The office may be present during any inspection and certification conducted pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) and may require the operator to take any corrective actions necessary to obtain and verify certification.

Any inspection and certification conducted by or under the supervision of the office shall be conducted promptly after the office is notified that the facility is ready to be inspected and shall not unduly delay the construction or operation schedule.

An application for an in situ leach mining operation shall include a baseline site characterization and a plan for ongoing monitoring of the affected land and affected surface and groundwater. Prior to submitting an application, the prospective applicant shall confer with the office concerning the baseline characterization and plan for ongoing monitoring of the affected land and affected surface and groundwater. The board or the office may retain an independent third-party professional expert to oversee baseline site characterization, monitor field operations, or review any portion of the information collected, developed, or submitted by an applicant or prospective applicant pursuant to this subsection (5). The prospective applicant shall pay the reasonable costs incurred by the board or office and the expert selected by the board or office; except that the board or office shall define the scope of work to be accomplished by the expert and shall review and approve all invoices to be paid by the prospective applicant. The prospective applicant may object to the selection of any such expert if the prospective applicant has knowledge or information that the expert lacks the professional qualifications to accomplish the scope of work, has a conflict of interest with the prospective applicant or the project that will be the subject of the application, or has a bias that could influence the objectivity of the work to be accomplished. If the board or office concurs with the prospective applicant, a new expert shall be selected by the board or office.

Prior to submitting an application, a prospective applicant for in situ leach mining shall design and conduct a scientifically defensible groundwater, surface water, and environmental baseline characterization and monitoring plan for the proposed mining operation. This plan shall be designed in such a manner as to:

Thoroughly characterize premining site conditions;

Detect any subsurface excursions of groundwater containing chemicals used in or mobilized by in situ leach mining during the mining operations; and

Evaluate the effectiveness of postmining reclamation and groundwater reclamation plans.

The design and operation of the baseline characterization and monitoring plan for in situ leach mining, together with all information collected in accordance with the plan, shall be a matter of public record regardless of whether such activities are conducted pursuant to a notice of intent to conduct prospecting operations under section 34-32-113.

Notwithstanding section 34-32-103 (6), in the case of in situ leach mining, reclamation of groundwater shall begin in accordance with the reclamation plan approved by the board immediately when either of the following occur:

Detection pursuant to the baseline characterization and monitoring plan approved by the board of any subsurface excursion of groundwater outside of the affected land containing chemicals used in or mobilized by in situ leach mining during the mining operations or groundwater outside of the affected land that otherwise fails to meet the standards established in section 34-32-116 (8);

Cessation of production operations.

If the operator plans to cease operation on a temporary basis, the operator shall notify the board at least thirty days prior to such temporary cessation setting forth both the reasons for the temporary cessation and the expected duration of the temporary cessation. The operator shall maintain a groundwater monitoring and pumping regime satisfactory to the board during any period of temporary cessation of operations. If, in the judgment of the board, the expected duration of any temporary cessation will be of such length that the board believes that groundwater reclamation should commence, it shall so order.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1180, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(5) added, p. 937, § 5, effective May 20.

34-32-113. Prospecting notice - reclamation requirements - rules.

Any person desiring to conduct prospecting shall, prior to entry upon the lands, file with the board a notice of intent to conduct prospecting operations on a form approved by the board. Such notice shall be accompanied by a fee as specified in section 34-32-127 (2).

The notice form shall contain the following:

The name of the person or organization doing the prospecting;

A statement that prospecting will be conducted pursuant to the terms and conditions listed on the approved form;

A brief description of the type of operations which will be undertaken;

A description of the lands to be prospected by township and range;

An approximate date of commencement of operations; and

Measures to be taken to reclaim any affected land consistent with the requirements of section 34-32-116.

All information provided to the board in a notice of intent to conduct prospecting or a modification of such a notice is a matter of public record subject to the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S., including, in the case of a modification, the original notice of intent; except that information relating to the mineral deposit location, size, or nature and, as determined by the board, other information designated by the operator as proprietary or trade secrets or that would cause substantial harm to the competitive position of the operator shall be protected as confidential information by the board and shall not be a matter of public record in the absence of a written release from the operator or until a finding by the board that reclamation is satisfactory. Such information designated as exempt shall remain confidential until a final determination by the board. The board shall promulgate rules implementing this subsection (3) and shall consider information including the timing of the disclosure of the operator's identity.

Upon filing the notice of intent to conduct prospecting, the person shall provide financial warranty in the amount of two thousand dollars per acre of the land to be disturbed or such other amount as determined by the board.

A person may submit statewide warranties for prospecting if such warranties are in an amount fixed by the board by rule and such person otherwise complies with the provisions of this section for every area to be prospected.

Upon completion of the prospecting, there shall be filed with the board a notice of completion of prospecting operations. Within ninety days after the filing of the notice of completion, the board shall notify the person who had conducted the prospecting operations of the steps necessary to reclaim the land.

(5.5) (a) Without regard to the one thousand six hundred square foot limitation of section 34-32-103 (12), all drill holes sunk for the purpose of prospecting for locatable or leasable minerals on any land within the state of Colorado shall be plugged, sealed, or capped pursuant to this subsection (5.5) by the person conducting the prospecting. This subsection (5.5) shall not apply to holes drilled in conjunction with a mining operation for which the board has issued a permit nor to wells or holes regulated pursuant to section 34-33-117 and to article 60 of this title or article 80, 90, 91, or 92 of title 37, C.R.S.

Drill holes sunk for the purpose of prospecting shall be abandoned in the following manner:

Any artesian flow of groundwater to the surface shall be eliminated by a plug made of cement or similar material or by a procedure sufficient to prevent such artesian flow.

Drill holes which have encountered any aquifer in volcanic or sedimentary rock, as aquifer is defined in section 37-90-103 (2), C.R.S., shall be sealed utilizing a sealing procedure which is adequate to prevent fluid communication between aquifers.

Each drill hole shall be securely capped at a minimum depth compatible with local cultivation practices or at a minimum of two feet below either the original land surface or the collar of the hole, whichever is the lower elevation. The cap is to be made of concrete or other material which is satisfactory for such capping. The site shall be backfilled above the cap to the original land surface.

If any drill hole is to be ultimately used as or converted to a water well, the user shall comply with the applicable provisions of title 37, C.R.S.

Each drill site shall be reclaimed pursuant to section 34-32-116, including, if necessary, reseeding if grass or any other crop was destroyed.

Abandonment in the manner provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (5.5) shall occur immediately following the drilling of the hole and the probing for minerals in the prospecting process. However, a drill hole may be maintained as temporarily abandoned without being plugged, sealed, or capped. However, no drill hole which is to be temporarily abandoned without being plugged, sealed, or capped shall be left in such a condition as to allow fluid communication between aquifers. Such temporarily abandoned drill holes shall be securely covered in a manner which will prevent injury to persons and animals.

No later than sixty days after the completion of the abandonment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (5.5) of any drill hole that has artesian flow at the surface, the person conducting the prospecting shall submit to the head of the office a report containing the location of such hole to within two hundred feet of its actual location, the estimated rate of flow of such artesian flow, if such is known, and the facts of the technique used to plug such hole.

No later than twelve months after the completion of the abandonment of any drill hole pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (5.5), there shall be filed by the person conducting the prospecting with the head of the office a report containing the location of the hole to the nearest forty-acre legal subdivision and the facts of the technique used to plug, seal, or cap the hole.

The head of the office may not waive any of the administrative provisions of this subsection (5.5).

The board shall inspect the lands prospected within thirty days after the person prospecting the lands completes the reclamation and notifies the board that the reclamation is finished. If the board finds the reclamation satisfactory, the board shall release applicable performance and financial warranties.

The financial warranty shall not be held for more than thirty days after the completion of the reclamation.

The board is authorized to inspect any ongoing prospecting operation or any prospecting operation prior to the request for release of performance and financial warranties, in order to determine compliance with the terms of this article.

Upon the submittal of a notice of intent to conduct prospecting operations or a modification of such a notice, the person submitting such notice or modification shall give an electronic version of the notice or modification, except for that information exempted from public disclosure under subsection (3) of this section and that information designated by the person as exempt from disclosure under subsection (3) of this section, to the board in a format determined by the board. The division shall post such version of the notice or modification on its website.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 736, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(5.5) and (8) added, p. 687, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(4), (6), (7), and (8) amended, p. 1670, § 7, effective June 19.

L. 83:

(3) amended, p. 2051, § 23, effective October 14.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 1435, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(5.5)(d), (5.5)(e), and (5.5)(f) amended, p. 1941, § 39, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(4) amended, p. 1181, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(3), (5.5)(d), (5.5)(e), and (5.5)(f) amended and (9) added, p. 1705, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1979, § 111, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-111 as it existed prior to 1976.

34-32-114. Protests and petitions for hearing.

Any person has the right to file written objections to or statements in support of an application for a permit with the board. Such protests or petitions for a hearing shall be timely filed with the board not more than twenty days after the date of last publication of notice pursuant to section 34-32-112 (10). For good cause shown in the protest or petition documents, the board, in its discretion, may hold a hearing pursuant to section 34-32-115 on the question of whether the permit should be granted. The applicant shall be notified within ten days of any objections to his application and be supplied with a copy of the written objections.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 737, § 1, effective July 1.